Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4529
Relation to federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

The Uniform Trust Decanting Act modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7003(b), as such sections existed on November 14, 2020.

Laws 2020, LB808, § 39.